Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2209XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 199 Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 66, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 257.10, subsection 9, paragraph c, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) The unadjusted teacher salary supplement district cost 5 is the teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil for 6 each school district for a budget year multiplied by the sum 7 of the budget enrollment for that school district plus the 8 number of resident pupils in the school district that received 9 an education savings account payment under section 257.11B for 10 the base year . 11 Sec. 3. Section 257.10, subsection 10, paragraph c, 12 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 (1) The unadjusted professional development supplement 14 district cost is the professional development supplement 15 district cost per pupil for each school district for a budget 16 year multiplied by the sum of the budget enrollment for that 17 school district plus the number of resident pupils in the 18 school district that received an education savings account 19 payment under section 257.11B for the base year . 20 Sec. 4. Section 257.10, subsection 11, paragraph c, 21 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 (1) The unadjusted early intervention supplement district 23 cost is the early intervention supplement district cost per 24 pupil for each school district for a budget year multiplied 25 by the sum of the budget enrollment for that school district 26 plus the number of resident pupils in the school district that 27 received an education savings account payment under section 28 257.11B for the base year . 29 Sec. 5. Section 257.10, subsection 12, paragraph c, 30 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 (1) The unadjusted teacher leadership supplement district 32 cost is the teacher leadership supplement district cost per 33 pupil for each school district for a budget year multiplied 34 by the sum of the budget enrollment for that school district 35 -1- LSB 2209XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 199 plus the number of resident pupils in the school district that 1 received an education savings account payment under section 2 257.11B for the base year . 3 Sec. 6. Section 422.7, subsection 43, Code 2025, is amended 4 by striking the subsection. 5 Sec. 7. REPEAL. Section 257.11B, Code 2025, is repealed. 6